hu: Báb és bábszínház kiegészítő típusa: Bábmozgató rúd/kereszt; Bábjelmez/ruházat; Bábjavító készlet; Tartalék bábszálak; Báb cipő/kiegészítő készlet; Bábállvány/kijelző; Bábtároló/hordozótáska; Bábszínházi háttér; Bábszínházi függöny; Bábszínházi világítás; Bábszínházi díszlet; Bábszínházi feliratok/jegyek; Bábszínházi hangmodul; Bábszínházi kellékek; Bábparóka/haj; Egyéb
ja: 人形劇アクセサリータイプ: パペットコントロールバー/クロス; パペットコスチューム/服; パペット修理キット; パペット交換用糸; パペットシューズ/アクセサリーセット; パペットスタンド/ディスプレイ; パペット収納/キャリーバッグ; パペットシアター背景; パペットシアターカーテン; パペットシアター照明; パペットシアターセット装飾; パペットシアター看板/チケット; パペットシアターサウンドモジュール; パペットシアターステージ小道具; パペットウィッグ/髪; その他
cs: Typ příslušenství loutek a loutkového divadla: Vahadlo na loutku (vodicí kříž); Kostým/oblečení pro loutky; Sada na opravu loutek; Náhradní provázky k loutkám; Sada bot / doplňků pro loutky; Stojánek / výstavní prvek na loutky; Taška na úschovu / přenos loutek; Pozadí loutkového divadla; Opona loutkového divadla; Osvětlení loutkového divadla; Dekorace loutkového divadla; Cedule/vstupenky pro loutkové divadlo; Zvukový modul pro loutkové divadlo; Jevištní rekvizity pro loutkové divadlo; Paruka/vlasy pro loutky; Jiné
sv: Typ av tillbehör för dockor/dockteater: Styrkors för marionett; Dockdräkt/dockkläder; Reparationskit för docka; Ersättningssnören för docka; Dockskor/tillbehörs-set; Dockställ/display; Dockförvaring/bärväska; Bakgrund för dockteater; Ridå för dockteater; Belysning för dockteater; Scenografi för dockteater; Skyltar/biljetter för dockteater; Ljudmodul för dockteater; Scenrekvisita för dockteater; Peruk/hår för docka; Övrigt
pt-BR: Marionetes e teatro de marionetes, tipo de acessório: Barra/cruz de controle para marionete; Fantasia/roupa de fantoche; Kit de reparo de fantoche; Fios de reposição para marionete; Conjunto de sapatos/acessórios para fantoche; Suporte/expositor de fantoche; Bolsa de armazenamento/transporte de fantoche; Pano de fundo de teatro de fantoches; Cortina de teatro de fantoches; Iluminação de teatro de fantoches; Cenografia de teatro de fantoches; Sinalização/ingressos de teatro de fantoches; Módulo de som de teatro de fantoches; Adereços de palco de teatro de fantoches; Peruca/cabelo de fantoche; Outro
zh-CN: 木偶/木偶台配件类型: 木偶控制杆/十字架; 木偶服装/衣物; 木偶维修套件; 木偶替换线; 木偶鞋/配件套装; 木偶支架/展架; 木偶收纳/便携袋; 木偶剧场背景; 木偶剧场幕布; 木偶剧场灯光; 木偶剧场布景; 木偶剧场招牌/门票; 木偶剧场发声模块; 木偶剧场舞台道具; 木偶假发/头发; 其他
ru: Тип аксессуара для кукольного театра: Вага (крестовина для управления куклой); Костюм/одежда для куклы; Набор для ремонта куклы; Запасные нити для куклы; Набор обуви/аксессуаров для куклы; Подставка/витрина для куклы; Сумка для хранения/переноски куклы; Декорации для кукольного театра; Занавес для кукольного театра; Освещение для кукольного театра; Оформление сцены кукольного театра; Вывески/билеты для кукольного театра; Звуковой модуль для кукольного театра; Сценический реквизит для кукольного театра; Парик/волосы для куклы; Другое
tr: Kukla ve kukla tiyatrosu aksesuar türü: Kukla kontrol çubuğu/istavrozu; Kukla kostümü/kıyafeti; Kukla tamir kiti; Kukla yedek ipleri; Kukla ayakkabıları/aksesuar seti; Kukla standı/sergileme ünitesi; Kukla saklama/taşıma çantası; Kukla tiyatrosu arka planı; Kukla tiyatrosu perdesi; Kukla tiyatrosu ışıklandırması; Kukla tiyatrosu dekoru; Kukla tiyatrosu tabelası/biletleri; Kukla tiyatrosu ses modülü; Kukla tiyatrosu sahne donanımları; Kukla peruğu/saçı; Diğer
vi: Loại phụ kiện cho rối và sân khấu rối: Thanh/chữ thập điều khiển con rối; Trang phục/quần áo con rối; Bộ sửa chữa con rối; Dây thay thế con rối; Giày/bộ phụ kiện con rối; Giá đỡ/trưng bày con rối; Túi đựng/bảo quản con rối; Phông nền sân khấu kịch rối; Rèm sân khấu kịch rối; Đèn sân khấu kịch rối; Đồ trang trí sân khấu kịch rối; Biển hiệu/vé sân khấu kịch rối; Mô-đun âm thanh sân khấu kịch rối; Đạo cụ sân khấu kịch rối; Tóc giả/tóc con rối; Khác
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ για κούκλες και κουκλοθέατρο: Ράβδος/σταυρός ελέγχου μαριονέτας; Κοστούμι/ρούχα μαριονέτας; Κιτ επισκευής μαριονέτας; Ανταλλακτικά νήματα μαριονέτας; Σετ παπουτσιών/αξεσουάρ μαριονέτας; Βάση/εκθετήριο μαριονέτας; Τσάντα αποθήκευσης/μεταφοράς μαριονέτας; Σκηνικό κουκλοθέατρου; Αυλαία κουκλοθέατρου; Φωτισμός κουκλοθέατρου; Διακόσμηση σκηνικού κουκλοθέατρου; Σήμανση/εισιτήρια κουκλοθέατρου; Μονάδα ήχου κουκλοθέατρου; Σκηνικά αντικείμενα κουκλοθέατρου; Περούκα/μαλλιά μαριονέτας; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lėlių ir lėlių teatrų priedų tipas: Lėlių valdymo lazdelė / kryžmė; Lėlės kostiumas / drabužiai; Lėlių taisymo rinkinys; Pakaitinės lėlių virvelės; Lėlių batų / aksesuarų rinkinys; Lėlių stovas / vitrina; Lėlių laikymo / nešiojimo krepšys; Lėlių teatro fonas; Lėlių teatro užuolaida; Lėlių teatro apšvietimas; Lėlių teatro dekoracijos; Lėlių teatro iškabos / bilietai; Lėlių teatro garso modulis; Lėlių teatro scenos rekvizitas; Lėlės perukas / plaukai; Kita
fi: Nukkejen ja nukketeatterin lisävarustetyyppi: Nukenkäyttimen ohjaustanko/risti; Nuken puku/vaatteet; Nuken korjaussarja; Nuken vaihtonarut; Nuken kengät / lisävarustesetti; Nuken jalusta/näyttöteline; Nuken säilytys-/kantokassi; Nukketeatterin taustakangas; Nukketeatterin esirippu; Nukketeatterin valaistus; Nukketeatterin lavastus; Nukketeatterin opasteet/liput; Nukketeatterin äänimoduuli; Nukketeatterin tarpeisto; Nuken peruukki/hiukset; Muu
zh-TW: 布袋戲偶/戲台配件類型: 懸絲傀儡控制十字把/操縱桿; 布偶服裝/衣物; 布偶修補套件; 懸絲傀儡替換線; 布偶鞋子/配件組; 布偶立架/展示架; 布偶收納袋/提袋; 偶劇劇場背景幕; 偶劇劇場布幕; 偶劇劇場燈光; 偶劇劇場佈景裝飾; 偶劇劇場招牌/門票; 偶劇劇場音效模組; 偶劇劇場舞台道具; 布偶假髮/頭髮; 其他
th: ประเภทหุ่นเชิดและอุปกรณ์โรงละครหุ่นเชิด: ไม้ควบคุมหุ่นเชิด/ไม้กากบาท; ชุด/เสื้อผ้าหุ่นเชิด; ชุดอุปกรณ์ซ่อมแซมหุ่นเชิด; เชือกสำหรับเปลี่ยนหุ่นเชิด; ชุดรองเท้า/เครื่องประดับหุ่นเชิด; ขาตั้ง/ชั้นวางหุ่นเชิด; ถุงเก็บ/กระเป๋าใส่หุ่นเชิด; ฉากหลังโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; ม่านโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; ระบบไฟโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; การตกแต่งฉากโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; ป้าย/ตั๋วโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; โมดูลเสียงโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; อุปกรณ์ประกอบฉากโรงละครหุ่นเชิด; วิกผม/ผมหุ่นเชิด; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de accesorios para teatro de títeres y marionetas: Barra/cruceta de control de títere; Disfraz/ropa de títere; Kit de reparación de títere; Hilos de repuesto para títeres; Juego de zapatos/accesorios para títeres; Soporte/expositor de títeres; Bolsa de almacenamiento/transporte de títeres; Telón de fondo de teatro de títeres; Cortina de teatro de títeres; Iluminación de teatro de títeres; Decoración escénica de teatro de títeres; Señalización/entradas de teatro de títeres; Módulo de sonido de teatro de títeres; Utilería de teatro de títeres; Peluca/cabello de títere; Otro
bg-BG: Тип аксесоар за кукли и куклен театър: Контролен лост/кръст за кукли; Костюм/дрехи за кукли; Комплект за поправка на кукли; Резервни конци за кукли; Обувки/комплект аксесоари за кукли; Стойка/дисплей за кукли; Чанта за съхранение/пренасяне на кукли; Декор за куклен театър; Завеса за куклен театър; Осветление за куклен театър; Сценична декорация за куклен театър; Табели/билети за куклен театър; Звуков модул за куклен театър; Сценичен реквизит за куклен театър; Перука/коса за кукли; Друго
nl: Type accessoires voor poppenkastpoppen en poppenkasten: Bedieningskruis/speelkruis voor marionetten; Poppenkostuum/-kleding; Poppenreparatiekit; Vervangende draden voor marionetten; Poppenschoenen/-accessoireset; Poppenstandaard/-display; Poppenopbergtas/-draagtas; Poppenkastachtergrond; Poppenkastgordijn; Poppenkastverlichting; Poppenkastdecoratie; Poppenkastborden/-kaartjes; Poppenkastgeluidsmodule; Poppenkastrekwisieten; Poppenpruik/-haar; Overig
en: Puppet & puppet theater accessory type: Puppet control bar/cross; Puppet costume/clothing; Puppet repair kit; Puppet replacement strings; Puppet shoes/accessory set; Puppet stand/display; Puppet storage/carry bag; Puppet theater backdrop; Puppet theater curtain; Puppet theater lighting; Puppet theater set dressing; Puppet theater signage/tickets; Puppet theater sound module; Puppet theater stage props; Puppet wig/hair; Other
nb: Tilbehørstype for dukke og dukketeater: Styrekors til dukke; Dukkekostyme/-klær; Reparasjonssett til dukke; Reservetråder til dukke; Dukkesko/-tilbehørssett; Dukkestativ/-utstilling; Oppbevarings-/bæreveske til dukke; Bakteppe til dukketeater; Teppe til dukketeater; Belysning til dukketeater; Kulisser til dukketeater; Skilting/billetter til dukketeater; Lydmodul til dukketeater; Scenerekvisitter til dukketeater; Dukkeparykk/-hår; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de marioneta e acessório para teatro de marionetas: Barra/cruz de controlo de marionetas; Disfarce/roupa de marioneta; Kit de reparação de marionetas; Fios de substituição de marionetas; Conjunto de sapatos/acessórios de marioneta; Suporte/expositor de marionetas; Saco de arrumação/transporte de marionetas; Pano de fundo de teatro de marionetas; Cortina de teatro de marionetas; Iluminação de teatro de marionetas; Cenografia de teatro de marionetas; Sinalética/bilhetes de teatro de marionetas; Módulo de som de teatro de marionetas; Adereços de palco de teatro de marionetas; Peruca/cabelo de marioneta; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta dodatka za kazalište lutaka: Kontrolna letvica / križ za lutke; Kostim/odjeća za lutku; Komplet za popravak lutke; Zamjenske niti za lutku; Cipele / komplet dodataka za lutku; Stalak/prikaz za lutku; Torba za pohranu/nošenje lutke; Pozadina za kazalište lutaka; Zavjesa za kazalište lutaka; Rasvjeta za kazalište lutaka; Scenografija za kazalište lutaka; Natpisi/ulaznice za kazalište lutaka; Zvučni modul za kazalište lutaka; Kazališni rekviziti za kazalište lutaka; Perika/kosa za lutku; Ostalo
ko: 인형 및 인형극 무대 액세서리 유형: 인형 제어 바/크로스; 인형 의상/옷; 인형 수리 키트; 인형 교체용 줄; 인형 신발/액세서리 세트; 인형 스탠드/전시; 인형 보관/휴대용 가방; 인형극 배경; 인형극 커튼; 인형극 조명; 인형극 무대 장식; 인형극 간판/티켓; 인형극 사운드 모듈; 인형극 무대 소품; 인형 가발/머리카락; 기타
de: Art des Zubehörs für Puppen & Puppentheater: Marionetten-Spielkreuz; Puppenkostüm/-kleidung; Puppen-Reparaturset; Marionetten-Ersatzfäden; Puppenschuhe/Accessoire-Set; Puppenständer/-display; Puppen-Aufbewahrung/-Tragetasche; Hintergrund für Puppentheater; Vorhang für Puppentheater; Beleuchtung für Puppentheater; Ausstattung für Puppentheater-Kulissen; Schilder/Tickets für Puppentheater; Soundmodul für Puppentheater; Requisiten für Puppentheater; Puppenperücke/-haar; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva pre bábky a bábkové divadielka: Vodiaci kríž/tyč pre bábky; Bábkový kostým/oblečenie; Súprava na opravu bábok; Náhradné nite pre bábky; Súprava topánok a doplnkov pre bábky; Stojan/vitrína na bábky; Úložná/prenosná taška na bábky; Pozadie bábkového divadla; Opona bábkového divadla; Osvetlenie bábkového divadla; Dekorácie bábkového divadla; Značenie a lístky do bábkového divadla; Zvukový modul bábkového divadla; Javiskové rekvizity bábkového divadla; Parochňa/vlasy pre bábky; Iné
it: Tipo di accessorio per burattini e teatro dei burattini: Barra/croce di controllo per marionette; Costume/vestiti per marionette; Kit di riparazione per marionette; Fili di ricambio per marionette; Set scarpe/accessori per marionette; Supporto/espositore per marionette; Custodia/borsa per il trasporto per marionette; Fondale per teatrino; Sipario per teatrino; Illuminazione per teatrino; Scenografia per teatrino; Insegne/biglietti per teatrino; Modulo sonoro per teatrino; Accessori di scena per teatrino; Parrucca/capelli per marionette; Altro
fr: Type de marionnette et d'accessoire de théâtre de marionnettes: Barre/croix de contrôle de marionnette; Costume/vêtement de marionnette; Kit de réparation de marionnette; Fils de rechange pour marionnette; Ensemble de chaussures/accessoires pour marionnette; Support/présentoir pour marionnette; Sac de rangement/transport pour marionnette; Toile de fond pour théâtre de marionnettes; Rideau pour théâtre de marionnettes; Éclairage pour théâtre de marionnettes; Décor pour théâtre de marionnettes; Affiches/billets pour théâtre de marionnettes; Module sonore pour théâtre de marionnettes; Accessoires de scène pour théâtre de marionnettes; Perruque/cheveux de marionnette; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu pentru păpuși și teatru de păpuși: Bară/cruce de control pentru marionete; Costum/haine pentru marionetă; Kit de reparații pentru marionetă; Sfori de schimb pentru marionetă; Pantofi/set de accesorii pentru marionetă; Suport/vitrină pentru marionetă; Geantă de depozitare/transport pentru marionetă; Fundal pentru teatru de păpuși; Cortină pentru teatru de păpuși; Iluminat pentru teatru de păpuși; Decor pentru teatru de păpuși; Afișaje/bilete pentru teatru de păpuși; Modul de sunet pentru teatru de păpuși; Recuzită de scenă pentru teatru de păpuși; Perucă/păr pentru marionetă; Altele
pl: Typ akcesorium do pacynki i teatrzyku kukiełkowego: Krzyżak do sterowania kukiełką; Kostium / ubranko dla kukiełki; Zestaw naprawczy do kukiełek; Zapasowe sznurki do marionetek; Zestaw butów / akcesoriów dla kukiełek; Stojak / ekspozytor na kukiełki; Torba do przechowywania / przenoszenia kukiełek; Tło do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Kurtyna do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Oświetlenie teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Dekoracje do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Szyldy / bilety do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Moduł dźwiękowy do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Rekwizyty sceniczne do teatrzyku kukiełkowego; Peruka / włosy dla kukiełki; Inne
da: Tilbehørstype til dukker og dukketeater: Dukkestyrekors; Dukkekostume/tøj; Reparationssæt til dukke; Ekstra snore til dukke; Dukkesko/tilbehørssæt; Dukkestativ/display; Opbevaring/bæretaske til dukke; Baggrund til dukketeater; Tæppe til dukketeater; Belysning til dukketeater; Scenografi til dukketeater; Skilte/billetter til dukketeater; Lydmodul til dukketeater; Scenerekvisitter til dukketeater; Dukkeparyk/hår; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za lutke in lutkovno gledališče: Krmilna letvica/križ za lutke; Kostum/oblačila za lutke; Komplet za popravilo lutk; Nadomestne vrvice za lutke; Čevlji/komplet dodatkov za lutke; Stojalo/prikazovalnik za lutko; Torba za shranjevanje/prenašanje lutk; Ozadje za lutkovno gledališče; Zavesa za lutkovno gledališče; Osvetlitev za lutkovno gledališče; Scenografija za lutkovno gledališče; Oznake/vstopnice za lutkovno gledališče; Zvočni modul za lutkovno gledališče; Odrska rekvizita za lutkovno gledališče; Lasulja/lasje za lutko; Drugo